Utah statutes.
17-23-7.   Survey by direction of court -- Compensation.
When land, the title to which is in dispute before any court, is divided by a
county line, the court making an order of survey may direct the order to the
surveyor of any county in which any part of the land is situated. The court
order shall also provide for reasonable compensation for said services.
